Montana, session 2025, HB637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 14] may be cited as the "Montana Patient
and Physician Protections in Care Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 14], unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Adult" means an individual who is 18 years of age or older.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1
(2) "Capacity" means an individual's ability to understand and appreciate health care options
available to the individual, including significant benefits and risks, and to make and communicate an informed
health care decision. A determination of capacity must be made only according to the professional standards of
care and the provisions of 50-5-1302.
(3) "Health care entity" means an entity, other than an individual, that is licensed under Title 50 to
provide any form of health care in the state, including but not limited to a hospital, clinic, hospice, home health
agency, long-term care facility, pharmacy, group medical practice, medical home, or any similar entity.
(4) "Health care provider" means any of the following individuals authorized to prescribe a
medication to be used in medical aid in dying:
(a) a physician licensed pursuant to Title 37, chapter 3;
(b) an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under Title 37, chapter 8, to practice
professional nursing in this state and who has fulfilled the requirements of the board of nursing pursuant to 37-
8-202 and 37-8-409; or
(c) a physician assistant licensed pursuant to Title 37, chapter 20.
(5) "Medical aid in dying" means the medical practice in which a health care provider prescribes
medication to a qualified individual who may self-administer that medication to bring about a peaceful death.
(6) "Mental health professional" means:
(a) a physician licensed under Title 37, chapter 3;
(b) an advanced practice registered nurse, as provided for in 37-8-202, with a clinical specialty in
psychiatric mental health nursing;
(c) a psychologist licensed under Title 37, chapter 17;
(d) a social worker licensed under 37-39-308; or
(e) a professional counselor licensed under 37-39-309.
(7) "Prescribing health care provider" means a health care provider who prescribes medical aid in
dying medication.
(8) "Qualified individual" means an individual who has met the requirements of [section 3].
(9) "Self-administer" means taking an affirmative, conscious, voluntary act to ingest a
pharmaceutical substance.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1
(10) "Terminal condition" means a disease, illness, or condition that is incurable and irreversible and
that, in accordance with reasonable medical judgment, will result in death within 6 months.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Medical aid in dying -- prescribing health care provider
determination -- form. A prescribing health care provider may provide a prescription for medical aid in dying
medication to an adult only after the prescribing health care provider has:
(1) determined that the individual has:
(a) capacity;
(b) a terminal illness;
(c) voluntarily made the request for medical aid in dying; and
(d) the ability to self-administer the medical aid in dying medication;
(2) provided medical care to the individual in accordance with accepted medical standards of care;
(3) determined that the individual is making an informed decision after discussing with the
individual the:
(a) individual's medical diagnosis and prognosis;
(b) potential risks associated with self-administering the medical aid in dying medication that the
individual has requested the health care provider to prescribe;
(c) probable result of self-administering the medical aid in dying medication to be prescribed;
(d) individual's option of choosing to obtain the medical aid in dying medication and then deciding
not to use it; and
(e) feasible alternative, concurrent, or additional treatment opportunities, including hospice care
and palliative care focused on relieving symptoms and reducing suffering;
(4) determined in good faith that the individual's request does not arise from coercion or undue
influence by another person;
(5) noted in the individual's health record the prescribing health care provider's determination that
the individual qualifies to receive medical aid in dying;
(6) affirmed that the individual is:
(a) enrolled in a medicare-certified hospice program; or
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1
(b) eligible to receive medical aid in dying after the prescribing health care provider has referred
the individual to a consulting health care provider who has experience with the underlying condition that renders
the qualified individual terminally ill, and the consulting health care provider has:
(i) examined the individual;
(ii) reviewed the individual's relevant medical records;
(iii) determined the individual has capacity and has voluntarily made the request for medical aid in
dying; and
(iv) confirmed, in writing, the prescribing health care provider's prognosis that the individual is
suffering from a terminal illness;
(7) informed the individual of the importance of notifying the next of kin or any person who plays a
significant role in an individual’s life, which may include persons not legally related to the individual, of the
individual’s decision to request medication pursuant to [sections 1 through 14];
(8) educated the individual on:
(a) the recommended procedure for self-administering the medication to be prescribed;
(b) the safe-keeping and proper disposal of unused medication in accordance with state and
federal law;
(c) the importance of having another person present when the individual self-administers the
medication to be prescribed; and
(d) not taking the medical aid in dying medication in a public place; and
(9) provided substantially the following form to the individual and entered the form into the
individual's health record after the form has been completed with all the required signatures and initials:
"REQUEST FOR MEDICATION TO END MY LIFE IN A PEACEFUL MANNER
I, __________________________, am an adult of sound mind.
I am suffering from a terminal illness, which is a disease or condition that is incurable and irreversible
and that, according to reasonable medical judgment, will result in my death within six months. My health care
provider has determined that the illness is in its terminal phase.
______ (Patient Initials)
I have been fully informed of my diagnosis and prognosis, the nature of the medical aid in dying
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1
medication to be prescribed and the potential associated risks, the expected result, and the feasible alternative,
concurrent, or additional treatment opportunities, including hospice care and palliative care focused on relieving
symptoms and reducing suffering.
______ (Patient Initials)
I request that my health care provider prescribe medication that will end my life in a peaceful manner if I
choose to self-administer the medication, and I authorize my health care provider to contact a willing
pharmacist to fulfill this request.
______ (Patient Initials)
I understand that I have the right to rescind this request at any time. I understand that I am under no
obligation to fill the prescription once written or to self-administer the medication if I obtain it.
______ (Patient Initials)
I understand the full import of this request, and I expect to die if I self-administer the medical aid-in-
dying medication prescribed. I further understand that although most deaths occur within three hours, my death
may take longer. My health care provider has counseled me about this possibility.
______ (Patient Initials)
I make this request voluntarily and without reservation.
Signed: ____________________________________________
Date: ______________________ Time: _____________
DECLARATION OF WITNESSES:
I declare that the person signing this request:
(1) is personally known to me or has provided proof of identity;
(2) signed this request in my presence;
(3) appears to be of sound mind and not under duress, fraud, or undue influence;
(4) is not a relative of me by blood, marriage, or adoption; and
(5) is not a patient for whom I am a health care provider.
Witness:
Signature: _________________________________
Printed Name: _________________________________
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1
Relationship
to Patient: _________________________________
Date: _________________________________
NOTE: The witness may not be (1) a relative of the patient by blood, marriage, or adoption; (2) a
person who, at the time the request is signed, would be entitled to any portion of the estate of the qualified
patient upon death, under any will or by operation of law; or (3) an owner, operator, or employee of a health
care entity where the qualified patient is receiving medical treatment or is a resident."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Determining capacity. If an individual has a recent history of a mental
health disorder or an intellectual disability that could cause impaired judgment with regard to end-of-life medical
decisionmaking, or if, in the opinion of the prescribing health care provider or consulting health care provider,
an individual currently has a mental health disorder or an intellectual disability that may cause impaired
judgment with regard to end-of-life medical decisionmaking, the individual may not be determined to have
capacity to make end-of-life decisions until:
(1) the health care provider refers the individual for evaluation by a mental health professional with
the training and expertise to assess a person with such a disorder or disability; and
(2) the mental health professional determines the individual has capacity to make end-of-life
decisions after evaluating the individual during one or more visits with the individual.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Waiting period. (1) A prescription for medical aid in dying medication
may not be filled until 48 hours after the prescription for medical aid in dying medication has been written,
unless the qualified individual's prescribing health care provider has medically confirmed that the qualified
individual may, within reasonable medical judgment, die before the expiration of the waiting period required in
this section, in which case the prescription may be filled after the prescribing health care provider affirms that all
requirements have been fulfilled pursuant to [section 3].
(2) A prescription for medical aid in dying medication must indicate the date and time that the
prescription for medical aid in dying medication was written and indicate the first allowable date and time when
it may be filled.
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Medical aid in dying -- right to know. (1) A health care provider shall
inform a terminally ill patient of all reasonable options related to the patient's care that are legally available to
terminally ill patients who meet the medical standards of care for end-of-life care.
(2) A health care provider fails to obtain informed consent for subsequent medical treatment if an
individual requests information about medical aid in dying and within a reasonable time, the provider has failed,
at a minimum, to do either of the following:
(a) provide information to the individual about medical aid in dying and other legal end-of-life
options; or
(b) refer the individual to a health care provider who is able and willing to carry out the individual's
request or to another individual or entity to assist the requesting individual in seeking medical aid in dying.
(3) If the health care provider transfers the individual's care to a new health care provider, the prior
health care provider shall transfer, upon request, a copy of the individual's relevant medical records to the new
health care provider.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Safe disposal of unused medication. A person who has custody or
control of medication prescribed pursuant to [sections 1 through 14] after the qualified individual's death shall
dispose of the medication by lawful means in accordance with state and federal guidelines.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Immunities -- conscience-based decisions. (1) A person may not be
subject to civil or criminal liability, licensing sanctions, or other professional disciplinary action for:
(a) participating, or refusing to participate, in medical aid in dying in good faith compliance with the
provisions of [sections 1 through 14]; or
(b) being present when a qualified patient self-administers the prescribed medical aid in dying
medication to end the qualified individual's life in accordance with the provisions of [sections 1 through 14].
(2) A health care entity, professional organization or association, health insurer, managed care
organization, or health care provider may not subject a person to censure, discipline, suspension, loss or denial
of license, credential, privileges, or membership, or other penalty for participating, or refusing to participate, in
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1
the provision of medical aid in dying in good faith compliance with the provisions of [sections 1 through 14].
(3) A health care provider who objects for reasons of conscience to participating in the provision of
medical aid in dying is not required to participate in the provision of medical aid in dying under any
circumstance. If a health care provider is unable or unwilling to carry out an individual's request pursuant to
[sections 1 through 14], the health care provider shall inform the individual the health care provider is unwilling
or unable to carry out the individual's request and refer the individual to a health care provider who is able and
willing to carry out the individual's request or to another individual or entity to assist the requesting individual in
seeking medical aid in dying as provided in [section 6].
(4) A health care entity may not forbid or otherwise sanction a health care provider who provides:
(a) medical aid in dying in accordance with [sections 1 through 14] off the premises of the health
care entity when the health care provider is not acting within the normal course and scope of the health care
provider's employment with the health care entity; or
(b) scientific and accurate information about medical aid in dying to an individual when discussing
end-of-life care options.
(5) A health care entity may sanction a health care provider for participating in medical aid in dying
in accordance with [sections 1 through 14] on the premises of the prohibiting health care entity only if the health
care entity has given written notice to the health care provider of the prohibiting entity's written policy forbidding
participation in medical aid in dying and the health care provider participates in medical aid in dying:
(a) on the premises of the health care entity; or
(b) within the course and scope of the health care provider's employment for the health care entity.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent:
(a) a health care provider from participating in medical aid in dying in accordance with [sections 1
through 14] while the health care provider is acting outside the health care entity's premises or outside the
course and scope of the health care provider's capacity as an employee; or
(b) an individual who seeks medical aid in dying in accordance with [sections 1 through 14] from
contracting with the individual's prescribing health provider or consulting health care provider to act outside the
course and scope of the provider's affiliation with the sanctioning health care entity.
(7) A health care entity that imposes sanctions on a health care provider pursuant to [sections 1
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1
through 14] shall act reasonably, both substantively and procedurally, and may not be arbitrary or capricious in
its imposition of sanctions.
(8) Participating in medical aid in dying in accordance with [sections 1 through 14] may not be the
basis for a report of unprofessional conduct. Nothing in this section prevents the board of medical examiners
from investigating unprofessional conduct related to a failure to follow the requirements of [sections 1 through
14].
(9) A request by an individual for medical aid in dying alone does not constitute grounds for
neglect or elder abuse for any purpose of law and may not be the sole basis for appointment of a guardian or
conservator.
(10) (a) Care that complies with [sections 1 through 14] meets the medical standard of care.
(b) Nothing in [sections 1 through 14] exempts a provider or other medical personnel from meeting
medical standards of care for an individual's treatment. This section does not limit civil liability for intentional or
negligent misconduct or failure to comply with the requirements of [sections 1 through 14].

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Prohibited acts. Nothing in [sections 1 through 14] may be construed to
authorize a physician or any other person to end an individual's life by lethal injection, mercy killing, or
euthanasia. Actions taken in accordance with [sections 1 through 14] may not be construed, for any purpose, to
constitute suicide, assisted suicide, euthanasia, mercy killing, homicide, or adult abuse under the law.

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Reporting -- rulemaking. (1) A health care provider who prescribes
medical aid in dying to a qualified individual in accordance with the provisions of [sections 1 through 14] shall
provide, in accordance with department of public health and human services rules, a report of that provider's
participation. The department shall adopt rules that establish the timeframes and forms for reporting pursuant to
this section and shall limit the reporting of data relating to qualified individuals who received prescriptions for
medical aid in dying medication to the following:
(a) the qualified individual's age at death;
(b) the qualified individual's race and ethnicity;
(c) the qualified individual's gender;
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1
(d) whether the qualified individual was enrolled in hospice at the time of death;
(e) the qualified individual's underlying medical condition; and
(f) whether the qualified individual self-administered the medical aid in dying medication and, if so,
the date that this occurred.
(2) The department of public health and human services shall promulgate an annual statistical
report containing aggregated data on the information collected pursuant to subsection (1) on the total number of
medical aid in dying medication prescriptions written statewide and on the number of health care providers who
have issued prescriptions for medical aid in dying medication during that year. Data reported pursuant to this
subsection may not contain individually identifiable health information and individually identifiable health
information is exempt from disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Section 11. Effect on insurance and construction of wills, contracts, and
statutes. (1) Death resulting from medical aid in dying medication in accordance with [sections 1 through 14]
does not constitute, for any purpose, a suicide or a homicide.
(2) The sale, procurement, or issuance of a policy of life, health, or accident insurance, or annuity
policy, or the rate charged for the policy may not be conditioned on or affected by an individual's act of making
or rescinding a request for medication pursuant to [sections 1 through 14].
(3) A qualified individual's act of self-administering medication pursuant to [sections 1 through 14]
does not invalidate any part of a life, health, or accident insurance, or annuity policy, notwithstanding any term
of the policy to the contrary.
(4) It is unlawful for an insurer to deny or alter health care benefits otherwise available to an
individual with a terminal disease based on the availability of medical aid in dying or otherwise attempt to
coerce an individual with a terminal disease to make or rescind a request for medical aid in dying medication.
(5) A provision in a contract, will, or other agreement, whether written or oral, that would determine
whether an individual may make or rescind a request pursuant to [sections 1 through 14] is not valid.
(6) An obligation owing under any currently existing contract may not be conditioned or affected by
an individual's act of making or rescinding a request pursuant to [sections 1 through 14].

- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1
NEW SECTION. Section 12. Death certificate. (1) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, the
prescribing provider may sign the death certificate of an individual who obtained and self-administered a
prescription for medication pursuant to [sections 1 through 14].
(2) (a) When a death has occurred in accordance with [sections 1 through 14], the death must be
attributed to the underlying terminal condition.
(b) Death following self-administering medication under [sections 1 through 14] does not constitute
grounds for a postmortem inquiry.
(c) Death in accordance with [sections 1 through 14] may not be designated as a suicide or a
homicide.
(3) An individual's act of self-administering medication prescribed pursuant to [sections 1 through
14] may not be indicated on the death certificate.

NEW SECTION. Section 13. Liabilities and penalties. (1) A person who intentionally or knowingly
alters or forges an individual's request for medication pursuant to [sections 1 through 14] or conceals or
destroys a rescission for medication pursuant to [sections 1 through 14] is guilty of a felony and subject to the
penalties set forth in 46-18-213.
(2) A person who intentionally or knowingly coerces or exerts undue influence on an individual with
a terminal disease to request medication pursuant to [sections 1 through 14] or to request or use medication
pursuant to [sections 1 through 14] is guilty of a felony and subject to the penalties set forth in 46-18-213.
(3) Nothing in [sections 1 through 14] limits civil liability or damages arising from negligent conduct
or intentional misconduct by the health care provider or health care entity.
(4) The penalties specified in [sections 1 through 14] do not preclude criminal penalties under
other laws for conduct inconsistent with [sections 1 through 14].

NEW SECTION. Section 14. Claim by government entity for costs incurred. A government entity
that incurs costs resulting from self-administration of medication prescribed under [sections 1 through 14] in a
public place has a claim against the estate of the qualified individual to recover the costs and reasonable
attorney fees related to enforcing the claim.
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 637.1

NEW SECTION. Section 15. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 14] are intended to be
codified as a new chapter in Title 50, and the provisions of Title 50 apply to [sections 1 through 14].
- END -
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 637